District of Columbia statutes.
29A-613

Repealed

Quo warranto.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1282, ch. 854, § 586
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, 991, ch. 646, §§ 1, 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(1)(G)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-613.
1981 Ed., § 29-813.
1973 Ed., 29-413.